New Jersey, session 222, S1819.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section, nonpublic school means an elementary or secondary school within the State, other than a public school, offering education for grades kindergarten through 12, or any combination of them, wherein any child may legally fulfill compulsory school attendance requirements and which complies with the requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, Pub.L.88-352 (42 U.S.C. s.2000d et seq.). b.    (1)  In the event that a student enrolled in a nonpublic school transfers to a public school, the chief school administrator of the nonpublic school shall, upon the written request of the school district to which the student is transferring, provide to the district 1, within 14 calendar days of the districts request,1 all information in the students record related to disciplinary action taken against the student by the nonpublic school.  The nonpublic school shall also notify the district, in writing, if it has obtained any information pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1982, c.79 (C.2A:4A-60) or section 1 of P.L.2009, c.157 (C.2C:43-5.1) 1within 14 calendar days of the districts written request1.  If the school district does not receive those records, it shall use every available means to obtain the records. (2)  Written consent of the parent or adult student shall not be required as a condition of receipt of the information required to be provided pursuant to this section; however, written notice of the transfer shall be provided by the nonpublic school to the parent or adult student. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.